Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-467
General acute hospital; employees;
influenza vaccinations; tetanus-diphtheria-pertussis vaccine; duties; record.

(1) Each general acute hospital shall take all of the following actions
in accordance with the guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
of the United States Public Health Service of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services as the guidelines existed on January 1, 2013:

(a) Annually offer onsite influenza vaccinations to all hospital employees;

(b) Offer to all hospital employees a single dose of tetanus-diphtheria-pertussis
vaccine if they have not previously received such vaccine and regardless of
the time since their most recent vaccination with such vaccine; and

(c) Require all hospital employees to be vaccinated against influenza,
tetanus, diphtheria, and pertussis, except that an employee may elect not
to be vaccinated.

(2) The hospital shall keep a record of which hospital employees receive
the annual vaccination against influenza and a single dose of tetanus-diphtheria-pertussis
vaccine and which hospital employees do not receive such vaccinations.

(3) This section shall
not apply in individual cases when contraindicated or if a national shortage
of the vaccine exists.

Laws 2011, LB542, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB458, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB859, § 1.
July 18, 2014